Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 9. Electricity.

§ 45.2-926.
Overhead high-potential power lines; surface transmission lines; electric wiring in surface buildings.

Overhead high-potential power lines shall be (i) placed at least 15 feet above the ground and 20 feet above any driveway or haulage road, (ii) installed on insulators, and (iii) supported and guarded to prevent contact with other circuits.

Surface transmission lines shall be protected against short circuits and lightning.

Electric wiring in surface buildings shall be installed so as to prevent fire and contact hazards.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-82, 45-82.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-75; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.279; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-927.
Transformers.

Unless a surface transformer is isolated by elevation to a height of eight feet or more above the ground, it shall be enclosed in a transformer house or surrounded by a suitable fence at least six feet high. If the enclosure or fence is made of metal, such enclosure or fence shall be grounded effectively. The gate or door to the enclosure shall be kept locked at all times unless an authorized person is present.

Any surface transformer that contains flammable oil and is installed where it presents a fire hazard shall be provided with a means to drain or confine the oil in the event of a rupture of the transformer casing.

Suitable warning signs shall be posted conspicuously at every transformer station on the surface.

Every transformer station on the surface shall be kept free of nonessential combustible materials and refuse.

No electrical work shall be performed on any low-voltage, medium-voltage, or high-voltage distribution circuit or equipment except by (i) a certified person or (ii) a person who is trained to perform electrical work and to maintain electrical equipment and who is working under the direct supervision of a certified person. Every high-voltage circuit shall be grounded before repair work is performed. Disconnecting devices shall be locked out and suitably tagged by the person who performs electrical or mechanical work on such a circuit or on any equipment connected to the circuit. However, in a case in which such locking out is not possible, such devices shall be opened and suitably tagged by such person. Each lock and tag shall be removed only by the person who installed it or, if such person is unavailable, by a certified person who is authorized by the operator or his agent. However, an employee may, where necessary, repair energized trolley wires if he wears insulated shoes and lineman’s gloves.

This section does not prohibit a certified electrical repairman from making checks on or troubleshooting an energized circuit or an authorized person from performing repairs or maintenance on equipment once the power is off and the equipment is blocked against motion, except where motion is necessary to make adjustments.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-82 to 45-82.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-76, 45.1-78; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.280; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-928.
Grounding.

Every metallic sheath, armor, or conduit enclosing a power conductor shall be electrically continuous throughout and shall be grounded effectively.

Every metallic frame, casing, or other enclosure of stationary electric equipment that can become electrified through failure of insulation or by contact with energized parts shall be grounded effectively, or equivalent protection shall be provided.

When electric equipment is operated from a three-phase alternating current circuit originating in a transformer that is connected to provide a neutral point, a continuous grounding conductor of adequate size shall be installed and connected to the neutral point and to the frame of the power-utilizing equipment. Such grounding conductor shall be grounded at the neutral point and at intervals along the conductor, if feasible. A suitable circuit breaker or switching device shall be provided having a ground-trip coil connected in series with the grounding conductor to provide effective ground-fault tripping.

History.

1966, c. 594, § 45.1-79; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.281; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-929.
Circuit breakers and switches.

An automatic circuit breaking device or fuse of the correct type and capacity shall be installed so as to protect each piece of electric equipment and power circuit against excessive overload. Wire or another conducting material shall not be used as a substitute for a properly designed fuse, and every circuit breaking device shall be maintained in safe operating condition.

Operating controls, such as switches, starters, or switch buttons, shall be so installed that they are readily accessible and can be operated without danger of contact with moving or live parts.

Electric equipment and circuits shall be provided with switches or other controls of safe design, construction, and installation.

An insulating mat or other electrically nonconductive material shall be kept in place at each power-control switch and at stationary machinery where a shock hazard exists.

Suitable warning signs shall be posted conspicuously at every high-voltage installation.

Every power wire or cable shall have adequate current-carrying capacity, be guarded from mechanical injury, and be installed in a permanent manner.

Every power circuit shall be labeled to indicate the unit or circuit that it controls.

All persons shall stay clear of any electrically powered shovel or other similar heavy equipment during an electrical storm.

Every device that is installed on or after July 1, 2005, that provides either short circuit protection or protection against overload shall conform to the minimum requirements for protection of electric circuits and equipment of the National Electrical Code in effect at the time of its installation.

Every electric conductor installed on or after July 1, 2005, shall be sufficient in size to meet the minimum current-carrying capacity provided for in the National Electrical Code in effect at the time of its installation.

Every trailing cable purchased on or after July 1, 2005, shall meet the minimum requirements for ampacity provided in the standards of the Insulated Cable Engineers Association/National Electrical Manufacturers Association in effect at the time such cable is purchased.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-82, 45-82.1, 45-82.3, 45-82.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-78, 45.1-80, 45.1-81; 1978, c. 118; 1979, c. 315; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.282; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-930.
Electrical trailing cables.

Every trailing cable shall be provided with suitable short-circuit protection and a means of disconnecting power from the cable.B Any temporary splice in a trailing cable shall be made in a workmanlike manner and shall be mechanically strong and well-insulated.

C.

The number of temporary, unvulcanized splices in a trailing cable shall be limited to one.

D.

Every permanent splice in a trailing cable shall be made mechanically strong, with adequate electrical conductivity and flexibility, and shall be effectively insulated and sealed so as to exclude moisture. The finished splice shall be vulcanized or otherwise treated with suitable materials to provide flame-resistant properties and good bonding to the outer jacket.

E.

Every trailing cable shall be protected against mechanical injury.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-82.5; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-84; 1978, c. 118; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.283; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.